Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-158
Identification inspection; fees.

(1) For each identification inspection conducted by the patrol, the fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.

(2) For each identification inspection conducted by a county sheriff, the fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be paid to the county treasurer and credited to the county sheriff's vehicle inspection account within the county general fund.

(3) For each identification inspection conducted by the department, the fee shall be ten dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(4) There shall be no fee for an identification inspection when the ownership document presented is a United States Government Certificate to Obtain Title to a Vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 58;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 13.